Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.560

Failure to register—Penalties—Service of process.

A foreign limited liability partnership transacting business in this state without registering with the secretary of state is subject to RCW 23.95.505.

If a foreign limited liability partnership transacts business in this state without a registration as a foreign limited liability partnership, service of process with respect to a right of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state may be made on the foreign limited liability partnership in accordance with RCW 23.95.450.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5115; 2009 c 437 s 12; 1998 c 103 s 1203.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.